Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 26
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS

Section

6-26-101. Complaints to federal trade commission - attorney general to provide guidance.

The attorney general or the attorney general's designee, in collaboration with the broadband deployment board created in section 24-37.5-119, shall develop written guidance for consumers seeking to file a complaint with the federal trade commission to allege that an internet service provider, as defined in section 40-15-209 (4)(b), has engaged in any practice that violates federal law regarding interference with the open internet.

On or before October 1, 2019, the department of law shall post the written guidance developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section on its public website.

The attorney general, in collaboration with the broadband deployment board, shall update the written guidance as needed.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-078), ch. 210, p. 2216, § 3, effective May 17.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1109), ch. 489, p. 3527, § 5, effective July 7.